apertium-kab.kab.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Kabyle

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>  # Plural
# <sg>  # Singular

# Other symbols
# >      # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
#Feminine Singulars
:FemCircum(1) Stem FemCircum(2) [:<n><fem><sg>]
(:FemCircum(1) :Vsing-2(1) C-3(1) C-3(2) :Vsing-2(2) C-3(3) :FemCircum(2) [:<n><fem><sg>])[^[a-a,a-e,i-i,a-u,a-i],F]

#Feminine Plurals
(:FemCircum(1) PluPref C-3(1) C-3(2) :Vplu(1) C-3(3) PluSufIn [:<n><fem<pl>])[^[PlurA,PlurE,PlurU],F]
(:FemCircum(1) PluPref C-3(1) C-3(2) :Vplu(1) C-3(3) [:<n><fem><pl>])[^[PlurA,PlurE,PlurU],F]

#Masculine Singulars
Stem [:<n><masc><sg>]
(:Vsing-2(1) C-2(1) :Vsing-2(2) C-2(2) [:<n><masc><sg>])[^[a-a,a-e,i-i,a-u,a-i]]
(:Vsing-2(1) C-3(1) C-3(2) :Vsing-2(2) C-3(3) [:<n><masc><sg>])[^[a-a,a-i,a-u,a-e,i-i]]
(:Vsing-3(1) C-3.2(1) :Vsing-3(2) C-3.2(2) :Vsing-3(3) C-3.2(3) [:<n><masc><sg>])[^[a-a-i,a-a-u,a-u-i,a-a-e]]
(:Vsing-3.2(1) C-3.3(1) :Vsing-3.2(2) C-3.3(2) C-3.3(3) :Vsing-3.2(3) [:<n><masc><sg>])

#Masculine Plurals
(PluPref C-2(1) :Vplu(1) C-2(2) C-2(2) PluSufEn [:<n><masc><pl>])[^[PlurA,PlurE,PlurU]]
(PluPref C-3(1) C-3(2) :Vplu(1) C-3(3) PluSufEn [:<n><masc><pl>])[^[PlurA,PlurE,PlurU],SufEn]
(PluPref C-3(1) :Vplu(1) C-3(2) C-3(3) PluSufAn [:<n><masc><pl>])[^[PlurA,PlurE,PlurU],SufAn]
(PluPref C-3(1) C-3(2) :Vplu(1) C-3(3) [:<n><masc><pl>])[^[PlurA,PlurE,PlurU],reg]
(PluPref C-3(1) Vplu-2(1) C-3(2) Vplu-2(2) C-3(3) [:<n><masc><pl>])[int]
(PluPref C-3.2(1) Vplu-2(1) C-3.2(2) Vplu-2(2) C-3.2(3) [:<n><masc><pl>])[interne]
(PluPref C-3.3(1) Vplu-2(1) C-3.3(2) C-3.3(3) Vplu-2(2) [:<n><masc><pl>])

Punctuation


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################


LEXICON Stem
azrem #
ajenwi #poignard

LEXICON C-2(2)
f s[a-u,PlurA]
s f[a-i,PlurA]
ḍ r[a-a,PlurA] #pied
b x[a-u,PlurU] #suie


LEXICON C-3(3)
r g z[a-a,PlurA,SufEn] #man argaz-> irgazen
m ɣ r[a-a,PlurA,SufEn,F] #old man  -> amgar -> imgaren
d r r[a-a,int] #mountain adrar -> idurar
m r r[a-a,int] #rope amrar -> imurar
m c c[a-i,PlurA,reg,F] #cat amcic -> imcac
w t l[a-u,PlurA,reg] #rabbit awtul->iwtal
z g r[a-e,PlurA,SufEn] #beef
c k r[i-i,PlurE,SufAn]
y z ḍ[a-i,interne] #coq

LEXICON C-3.2(3)
y z ḍ[a-a-i,interne] #ayaziḍ-> iyuzaḍ
b g s[a-a-u,interne] #ceinture
m ḍ n[a-u-i,interne] #malade
m y g[a-a-e,interne] #côté du visage

LEXICON C-3.3(3)
b l m #marais malsain

LEXICON PluPref
:i

LEXICON FemCircum(2)
:t :t

#LEXICON Vsing-1(1)


LEXICON Vsing-2(2)
:a :a[a-a]
:a :i[a-i]
:a :u[a-u]
:a :e[a-e]
:i :i[i-i]

LEXICON Vsing-3(3)
:a :a :i[a-a-i]
:a :a :u[a-a-u]
:a :a :e[a-a-e]
:a :u :i[a-u-i]

LEXICON Vsing-3.2(3)
:a :a :a[a-a-a]

LEXICON Vplu(1)
:a[PlurA]
:e[PlurE]
:u[PlurU]

LEXICON Vplu-2(2)
:u :a

LEXICON FemSuf
:t

LEXICON PluSufEn
:>en

LEXICON PluSufAn
>:>an


LEXICON PluSufIn
>:>in


LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
